Utah statutes.
41-6a-1803.   Driver and passengers -- Seat belt or child restraint device
required.
(1) (a)  The operator of a motor vehicle operated on a highway shall:
(i)  wear a properly adjusted and fastened safety belt;
(ii)  provide for the protection of each person younger than eight years of
age by using a child restraint device to restrain each person in the manner
prescribed by the manufacturer of the device; and
(iii)  provide for the protection of each person eight years of age up to 16
years of age by securing, or causing to be secured, a properly adjusted and
fastened safety belt on each person.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirement under Subsection (1)(a)(ii), a child
under eight years of age who is 57 inches tall or taller:
(i)  is exempt from the requirement in Subsection (1)(a)(ii) to be in a child
restraint device; and
(ii)  shall use a properly adjusted and fastened safety belt as required in
Subsection (1)(a)(iii).
(2)  A passenger who is 16 years of age or older of a motor vehicle operated
on a highway shall wear a properly adjusted and fastened safety belt.
(3)  If more than one person is not using a child restraint device or wearing
a safety belt in violation of Subsection (1), it is only one offense and the
driver may receive only one citation.
(4)  For a person 19 years of age or older who violates Subsection (1)(a)(i)
or (2), enforcement by a state or local law enforcement officer shall be only
as a secondary action when the person has been detained for a suspected
violation of Title 41, Motor Vehicles, other than Subsection (1)(a)(i) or (2),
or for another offense.
